windows/es.dic
abanderar/IOPQRSTVWXrt
abaratar/IOPQRSTVWXrt
abismar/OPQRSTVWXrt
abollar/OPQRSTVXrt
aborrascar/OPRSVWXr
abotargar/OPRSVWXr
abribonar/OPRSVXr
abrumar/OPQRSTVWXrt
aburguesar/IOPRSVXr
acachar/OPRSVWXr
acapizar/OPRSVWXr
acartonar/OPRSVXr
accidentar/NOPQRSTVXrt
achiquitar/OPQRSTVWXrt
aclimatar/HOPQRSTVWXrt
acometer/IOQRTVWXrt
acondicionar/IOPQRSTVXrt
acordar/OPQRSTWXrt
acreditar/HOPQRSTVWXrt
acuitar/OPQRSTVWXrt
adecuar/HNOPQRSTVWX
adjuntar/OPQRSTUVWXrtu
adormir/OQWYoq
adulzorar/OPQRSTVXrt
aferrar/IOPQRSTVXrt
afincar/OPRSVWXr
aflojar/IOPQRSTVWXrt
agauchar/OPQRSTVWXrt
agitanar/OPQRSTVWXrt
agradar/OPRSVWXr
agriar/OPQRSTWXrt
aguantar/OPQRSTVWXrt
ahogar/IOPQRSTVXrt
ahuecar/IOPQRSTVWXrt
alabar/IOPQRSTVWXrt
aleccionar/IOPQRSTVXrt
aletargar/IOPQRSTVWXrt
alimonar/OPRSVXr
allegar/IOPQRSTVXrt
alternar/HLOPQRSTVXrt
amanerar/INOPQRSTVWXrt
amarrar/OPQRSTVWXrt
americanizar/OPQRSTVWXrt
amojamar/IOPQRSTVWXrt
amorriñar/OPRSVWXr
ampliar/HOPQRSTUWXrtu
anclar/OPQRSTVWXrt
anochecer/ORSWX
ansiar/OPQRSTWXrt
anunciar/HILOPQRSTVXrt
aparejar/IOPQRSTVWXrt
apenar/OPQRSTVWXrt
apianar/OPQRSTVWXrt
aplatanar/OPQRSTVWXrt
apoderar/IOPRSVWXr
apostar/LOPQRSTWXrt
apresurar/HINOPRSVWXr
aprovisionar/IOPQRSTVXrt
arabizar/HOPRSVWXr
arraigar/NOPQRSTVWXrt
arremolinar/OPRSVWXr
arrinconar/IOPQRSTVXrt
arropar/OPQRSTVWXrt
arrullar/OPQRSTVWXrt
asemejar/OPQRSTVWXrt
asfixiar/LOPQRSTVXrt
asustar/OPQRSTVWXrt
atener/ORWXo
atormentar/OPQRSTVXrt
atraer/OQWYoq
atribular/HOPQRSTVWXrt
aturrullar/OPQRSTVWXrt
aunar/OPQRSTWXrt
automatizar/HOPQRSTVWXrt
avergonzar/OPQRSTWXrt
avisar/OPQRSTVWXrt
bañar/OPQRSTVWXrt
bautizar/OPQRSTVWXrt
bloquear/LOPQRSTUVWXrtu
brindar/OPQRSTVXrt
burlar/OPQRSTVWXrt
calar/OPQRSTVWXrt
calibrar/HOPQRSTUVWXrtu
cantar/LOPQRSTUVWXrtu
caracterizar/HOPQRSTVWXrt
castigar/HOPQRSTVWXrt
ceder/OQRTUVXrtu
cerciorar/OPRSVXr
chamuscar/OPQRSTVWXrt
chivar/OPRSVWXr
clarear/OPQRSTVWXrt
cobijar/IOPQRSTVWXrt
cofinanciar/OPQRSTUVXrtu
colar/HOPQRSTWXrt
colocar/HOPQRSTUVXrtu
comenzar/OPQRSTWXrt
compaginar/HOPQRSTVWXrt
complacer/ILOQRTWXoq
comportar/IOPRSVXr
compungir/OQRTVWXrt
concentrar/HOPQRSTVWXrt
concomer/ORVWXr
conectar/OPQRSTUVWXrtu
confesar/LOPQRSTWXrt
confortar/HILOPQRSTVXrt
congratular/HOPQRSTVWXrt
conmocionar/OPQRSTVXrt
conservar/HLOPQRSTUVWXrtu
contabilizar/OPQRSTUVWXrtu
contentar/IOPQRSTVXrt
contradecir/OQWYoq
controlar/OPQRSTUVXrtu
convenir/LOWYo
correr/ILOQRTVWXrt
corromper/NOQRTVWXYrt
costear/OPQRSTVWXrt
crucificar/OPQRSTVWXrt
cuartear/OPQRSTVWXrt
curtir/ILOQRTVWXrt
debatir/OQRTVWXrt
decidir/NOQRTVWXrt
dedicar/HOPQRSTUVWXrtu
dejar/HIOPQRSTUVWXrtu
demorar/OPQRSTVXrt
denunciar/HLOPQRSTVXrt
derivar/HOPQRSTVWXrt
desabastecer/IOQRTWXoq
desaclimatar/OPQRSTVWXrt
desacreditar/OPQRSTVWXrt
desagraviar/OPQRSTVXrt
desahuciar/OPQRSTVXrt
desamorar/OPQRSTVXrt
desapropiar/HIOPRSVXr
desarrollar/OPQRSTUVXrtu
desatascar/OPQRSTVWXrt
desbabar/OPRSVWXr
desbocar/IOPQRSTVXrt
descalcificar/HOPQRSTVWXrt
descarar/INOPRSVWXr
descascarar/OPQRSTVWXrt
descifrar/OPQRSTVWXrt
descodificar/OPQRSTUVWXrtu
descomedir/OWYo
desconchabar/OPQRSTVWXrt
descontar/OPQRSTUWXrtu
descorazonar/IOPQRSTVXrt
descriar/OPRSWXr
descuajaringar/OPQRSTVWXrt
desear/OPQRSTVWXrt
desembelesar/OPRSVXr
desempañar/OPQRSTVWXrt
desempeorar/OPRSVXr
desencajar/IOPQRSTVWXrt
desencolerizar/OPQRSTVWXrt
desenfadar/OPQRSTVWXrt
desenganchar/OPQRSTVWXrt
desenredar/OPQRSTVWXrt
desentrañar/IOPQRSTVWXrt
desequilibrar/OPQRSTVWXrt
desestabilizar/HOPQRSTVWXrt
desfondar/OPQRSTVXrt
desgarrar/IOPQRSTUVWXrtu
desgoznar/OPQRSTVWXrt
desheredar/HIOPQRSTVWXrt
desigualar/OPQRSTVWXrt
desimpresionar/OPQRSTVXrt
desinteresar/NOPRSVXr
desligar/OPQRSTVWXrt
desmadejar/IOPQRSTVWXrt
desmangar/OPQRSTVWXrt
desmejorar/IOPQRSTVXrt
desmorecer/ORWXr
desnortar/OPRSVXr
desorbitar/NOPQRSTVWXrt
desparrancar/OPRSVWXr
despegar/INOPQRSTVXrt
despeluzar/IOPQRSTVWXrt
despersonalizar/HOPQRSTVWXrt
despiojar/OPQRSTVWXrt
desplumar/OPQRSTVWXrt
desposeer/IOQWY
despreocupar/HOPRSVWXr
despuntar/OPQRSTVWXrt
desriñonar/OPQRSTVXrt
destejer/OQRTVWXrt
destetar/OPQRSTVXrt
desubicar/OPQRSTVWXrt
desvanecer/INOQRTWXoq
desvivir/ORVWXr
detestar/HOPQRSTVXrt
devorar/OPQRSTVXrt
dignar/HOPRSVWXr
dinamizar/OPQRSTVWXrt
diseñar/OPQRSTUVWXrtu
dislocar/HOPQRSTVXrt
dispensar/HOPQRSTVXrt
distinguir/OQRTUVWXYrtu
divorciar/OPRSVXr
doctorar/IOPQRSTVXrt
donar/HLOPQRSTUVXrtu
drapear/OPQRSTVWXrt
educar/HOPQRSTVWXrt
elaborar/HNOPQRSTVXrt
embadurnar/OPQRSTVWXrt
embalsar/OPQRSTVWXrt
embarrancar/OPQRSTVWXrt
embellecer/IOQRTWXoq
embobecer/IOQRTWXrt
emborricar/OPRSVWXr
embregar/OPRSVXr
embrutecer/IOQRTWXoq
empadronar/IOPQRSTVXrt
emparamar/OPRSVWXr
empeñar/OPQRSTVWXrt
empinar/IOPQRSTVWXrt
emular/HOPQRSTUVWXrtu
enarenar/HOPQRSTVWXrt
encallecer/OQRTWXoq
encanecer/IORWXo
encariñar/OPQRSTVWXrt
encerrar/IOPQRSTUWXrtu
encorajinar/OPRSVWXr
encuitar/OPRSVWXr
endomingar/OPRSVWXr
enfiestar/OPRSVXr
enfurruñar/IOPRSVWXr
engarmar/OPRSVWXr
engranujar/OPRSVWXr
enllentecer/OQRTWXoq
enmalecer/OQRTWXoq
enmugrecer/OQRTWXoq
enrabietar/OPQRSTVXrt
enrobinar/OPRSVWXr
ensamblar/OPQRSTUVWXrtu
ensotar/OPRSVWXr
entonar/HIOPQRSTVXrt
entrecoger/OQRTUVWXrtu
entreverar/OPQRSTVWXrt
envanecer/IOQRTWXoq
enzarzar/OPQRSTVWXrt
escaldar/OPQRSTVWXrt
escocer/IORVWXr
escurrir/IOQRTVWXrt
espaciar/INOPQRSTVXrt
esposar/OPQRSTUVXrtu
esquilmar/OPQRSTUVWXrtu
estambrar/OPQRSTUVWXrtu
estibar/OPQRSTUVWXrtu
estirar/IOPQRSTUVWXrtu
estrangular/HIOPQRSTUVWXrtu
estropear/OPQRSTUVWXrtu
etiquetar/OPQRSTUVXrtu
evidenciar/OPQRSTUVXrtu
excavar/HOPQRSTUVWXrtu
exhortar/HOPQRSTUVXrtu
expandir/OQRTUVWXrtu
expresar/OPQRSTUVXrtu
extirpar/HOPQRSTUVWXrtu
exulcerar/HOPQRSTVWXrt
fallar/OPQRSTUVWXrtu
federar/HOPQRSTUVWXrtu
filar/OPQRSTUVWXrtu
fisgar/OPQRSTUVWXrtu
forjar/OPQRSTUVWXrtu
fotocopiar/OPQRSTUVXrtu
fregotear/OPQRSTUVWXrtu
fundamentar/OPQRSTUVXrtu
gasificar/HOPQRSTUVWXrtu
golpear/OPQRSTUVWXrtu
guarecer/OQRTWXoq
hacendar/OPQRSTWXrt
hespir/ORVWXr
hundir/IOQRTVWXrt
imitar/HOPQRSTVWXrt
incautar/HOPQRSTVWXrt
incubar/HOPQRSTVWXrt
inducir/OQRTWXoq
inflar/HOPQRSTUVWXrtu
iniciar/HOPQRSTUVXrtu
insertar/OPQRSTUVXrtu
insultar/LOPQRSTVWXrt
interpretar/HOPQRSTUVXrtu
inventar/OPQRSTUVXrtu
iterar/HOPQRSTVWXrt
jalar/OPRSVWXr
juntar/OPQRSTVWXrt
lamentar/HOPQRSTVXrt
legitimar/HOPQRSTVWXrt
licenciar/IOPQRSTVXrt
llenar/OPQRSTUVWXrtu
lucrar/OPQRSTVWXrt
malograr/IOPQRSTVWXrt
maquillar/OPQRSTVWXrt
masacrar/OPQRSTVWXrt
mecer/OQRTVXrt
mesar/OPQRSTVXrt
mirar/IOPQRSTVWXrt
mohecer/ORWXo
mosquear/OPQRSTVWXrt
mustiar/OPQRSTVXrt
nombrar/INOPQRSTVWXrt
observar/HLOPQRSTVWXrt
ofuscar/HIOPQRSTVWXrt
orear/OPQRSTVWXrt
ovillar/OPRSVWXr
paralizar/HLOPQRSTVWXrt
peer/OWYr
pensar/ILOPQRSTUWXrtu
perjurar/OPRSVWXr
pervertir/IOQWYoq
pintarrajear/OPQRSTVWXrt
poblar/HIOPQRSTWXrt
poseer/OQWY
predeterminar/HOPQRSTVWXrt
preservar/HOPQRSTVWXrt
privar/HNOPQRSTVWXrt
prolongar/HINOPQRSTVWXrt
prostituir/OQWYoq
purgar/HILOPQRSTVWXrt
radicar/HOPRSVWXr
reabsorber/OQRTVWXrt
reaprender/OQRTVXrt
recalcar/OPQRSTVWXrt
reclasificar/HOPQRSTVWXrt
recompilar/HOPQRSTUVWX
recostar/OPQRSTWXrt
reembolsar/OPQRSTVWXrt
reformar/HOPQRSTVWXrt
regocijar/NOPRSVWXr
reiniciar/OPQRSTUVXrtu
relacionar/OPQRSTVXrt
rematar/ILNOPQRSTVWXrt
remostecer/ORWXo
repatriar/HOPQRSTVXrt
reprender/OQRTVXrt
rescatar/OPQRSTVWXrt
resolver/OQRTUWYrtu
restar/LOPQRSTUVXrtu
retorcer/INOQRTWXrt
reunir/OQRTUWXrtu
revisar/OPQRSTUVWXrtu
rociar/IOPQRSTWXrt
saciar/OPRSVXr
salvar/HILOPQRSTUVWXrtu
señalar/INOPQRSTVWXrt
sepultar/OPQRSTVWXrt
sincronizar/HOPQRSTVWXrt
sobrescribir/OQRTUVWYrtu
solicitar/HLOPQRSTUVWXrtu
sonar/LOPRSWXr
subdividir/OQRTVWXrt
subyugar/HLOPQRSTVXrt
suministrar/HOPQRSTVWXrt
suspender/OQRTUVXrtu
tatuar/OPQRSTWXrt
titular/HOPQRSTVWXrt
traducir/OQRTWXoq
transparentar/OPQRSTVXrt
traspintar/OPRSVWXr
travestir/OQWYoq
tutear/OPQRSTVWXrt
utilizar/HOPQRSTUVWXrtu
vaporear/OPQRSTVWXrt
venir/OWYo
vincular/HLOPQRSTVWXrt
vulgarizar/HOPQRSTVWXrt
zarandear/OPQRSTVWXrt
